District of Columbia statutes.
2-827

Effective period of regulations and licenses; publication of regulations; penalties.

The regulations and licenses authorized by this chapter shall be in full force and effect only during the inaugural period. Such regulations shall be published in 1 or more of the daily newspapers published in the District of Columbia and no penalty prescribed for the violation of any such regulation shall be enforced until 5 days after such publication. Any person violating any regulation promulgated by the Council of the District of Columbia under the authority of this chapter shall be fined not more than $100 or imprisoned not more than 30 days. Each and every day a violation of such regulation exists shall constitute a separate offense, and the penalty prescribed shall be applicable to each such separate offense.

History

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1051, ch. 974, § 8
Jan. 30, 1968, 82 Stat. 4, Pub. L. 90-251, § 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1807.
1973 Ed., § 1-1208.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.